Utah statutes.
63G-7-805.   Liability insurance -- Insurance for employees authorized -- No right to indemnification or contribution from governmental agency.

(1) (a)  A governmental entity may insure any or all of its employees against liability, in whole or in part, for injury or damage resulting from an act or omission occurring during the performance of an employee's duties, within the scope of employment, or under color of authority, regardless of whether or not that entity is immune from suit for that act or omission.

(b)  Any expenditure for that insurance is for a public purpose.

(c)  Under any contract or policy of insurance providing coverage on behalf of a governmental entity or employee for any liability defined by this section, regardless of the source of funding for the coverage, the insurer has no right to indemnification or contribution from the governmental entity or its employee for any loss or liability covered by the contract or policy.

(2)  Any surety covering a governmental entity or its employee under any faithful performance surety bond has no right to indemnification or contribution from the governmental entity or its employee for any loss covered by that bond based on any act or omission for which the governmental entity would be obligated to defend or indemnify under the provisions of Section 63G-7-902.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

